Nebraska, session 109, LB64.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB64 LB64
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 44-3614, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
44-3614 (1)(a) (1) An issuer that makes a medicare supplement policy
or certificate available to an individual who is sixty-five years of age
and eligible for medicare benefits as described in 42 U.S.C. 1395c(1), as
such section existed on January 1, 2025 2024, shall make at least one
medicare supplement policy or certificate that meets the requirements of
the Medicare Supplement Insurance Minimum Standards Act, available to an
individual who is under sixty-five years of age and eligible for and
enrolled in medicare by reason of disability as described in 42 U.S.C.
1395c(2) and 42 U.S.C. 1395c(3), as such section existed on January 1,
2025 2024.
(b) Beginning January 1, 2026, applicants shall have an annual
thirty-day open enrollment period that begins on the date of the
applicant's birthday. During the open enrollment period, an issuer shall
be prohibited from:
(i) Denying or conditioning the issuance or effectiveness of any
medicare supplement policy or certificate that the issuer offers and that
is available for issuance in the state; (ii) subjecting an applicant to
medical underwriting or discriminating in the pricing of a medicare
supplement policy or certificate because of the applicant's health
status, claims experience, receipt of health care, or medical condition;
and (iii) imposing an exclusion of benefits based on an applicant's
preexisting condition.
(c) An issuer shall provide notice, in a form prescribed by the
commissioner of insurance, of the annual open enrollment period at the
time an applicant applies for a medicare supplement policy or
certificate.
(2) Premium rates for medicare supplement insurance policies or
certificates may differ between an individual who qualifies for medicare
who is sixty-five years of age or older and an individual who qualifies
-2-

LB64 LB64
2025 2025
for medicare by reason of disability and who is under sixty-five years of
age. Such differences in premiums shall not be excessive, inadequate, or
unfairly discriminatory and shall be based on sound actuarial principles
and be reasonable in relation to the benefits provided. The premium for
an individual who is under sixty-five years of age shall not exceed one
hundred fifty percent of the premium for a similarly situated individual
who is sixty-five years of age.
(3) An individual who is under sixty-five years of age and is
eligible for a medicare supplement policy or certificate by reason of
disability as described in subsection (1) of this section shall be
subject to the same open enrollment rules applicable to an individual who
is sixty-five years of age and eligible for a medicare supplement policy
or certificate as described in subsection (1) of this section beginning
on the first day of the first month that the individual turns sixty-five
years of age.
Sec. 2. Original section 44-3614, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-3-